Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.561

911 calls from radio communications and interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies—Technical and operational standards.

The state 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the 911 advisory committee, must set nondiscriminatory, uniform technical and operational standards consistent with the rules of the federal communications commission for the transmission of 911 calls from radio communications service companies and interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies to 911 emergency communications systems. These standards must be modernized to align with national standards adopted by the state of Washington in rule making and not exceed the requirements set by the federal communications commission. The authority given to the state 911 coordinator in this section is limited to setting standards as set forth in this section and does not constitute authority to regulate radio communications service companies or interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies.

[ 2022 c 203 s 17; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 21; 2002 c 341 s 6.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 341: See notes following RCW 38.52.501.